Hawaii statutes.
§415A-6 Rendering professional services.
A professional corporation may render professional services in this State only
through individuals permitted to render such services in this State; but
nothing in this chapter shall require any person who is employed by a
professional corporation to be licensed to perform services for which no
license is otherwise required or prohibit the rendering of professional
services by a licensed individual acting in the licensee's individual capacity.
[L 1985, c 259, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 135, §113]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next